tests/morphophonology/optative.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  tat.autogen.hfst
    Morph: tat.automorf.hfst

Tests: 

  "[twol] 3p.pl":
     кара<vaux><opt><p3><pl> : карасыннар
     бәйлә<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : бәйләсеннәр
     укы<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : укысыннар
     селке<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : селкесеннәр
     сук<v><iv><opt><p3><pl> : суксыннар
     сүк<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : сүксеннәр
     буя<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : буясыннар
     сөй<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : сөйсеннәр

  "[twol] 3p.sg":
     кара<vaux><opt><p3><sg> : карасын
     бәйлә<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : бәйләсен
     укы<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : укысын
     селке<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : селкесен
     сук<v><iv><opt><p3><sg> : суксын
     сүк<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : сүксен
     буя<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : буясын
     сөй<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : сөйсен
     си<v><iv><opt><p3><sg> : сисен

  "[twol] 1p.sg":
     кара<vaux><opt><p1><sg> : карыйм
     бәйлә<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : бәйлим
     укы<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : укыйм
     селке<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : селким
     сук<v><iv><opt><p1><sg> : сугыйм
     сүк<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : сүгим
     буя<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : буйыйм
     сөй<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : сөйим
     си<v><iv><opt><p1><sg> : сиим
     бае<v><iv><opt><p1><sg> : байыйм

  "[twol] 1p.pl":
     кара<vaux><opt><p1><pl> : карыйк
     бәйлә<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : бәйлик
     укы<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : укыйк
     селке<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : селкик
     сук<v><iv><opt><p1><pl> : сугыйк
     сүк<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : сүгик
     буя<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : буйыйк
     сөй<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : сөйик
